Illinois, session 104th, HB2197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Music Therapy Licensing and Practice Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 56/1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Music 9Therapy Licensing and Practice Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-993, eff. 5-27-22.)